Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201816-231
Health; nuisances; regulation.

A city of the first class may prevent any person from bringing, depositing, having, or leaving upon or near his or her premises or elsewhere in the city or within the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city any carcass or putrid beef, pork, fish, hides, or skins of any kind or any unwholesome substance and may compel the removal of the same.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XXXVIII, p. 256;

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 111;

R.S.1913, § 4847;

C.S.1922, § 4015;

C.S.1929, § 16-232;

R.S.1943, § 16-231;

Laws 1988, LB 934, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 34.

City had power to contract for removal of refuse, filth, and garbage from public and private premises, within its limits, and to pay therefor from the miscellaneous fund appropriated for such purposes, though it was impossible to estimate the exact amount required at time the appropriation was made. Kelly v. Broadwell, 3 Neb. Unof. 617, 92 N.W. 643 (1902).